Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.180

Ownership of county roads to revert to city or town—Territory within city or town to be removed from fire protection, road, and library districts.

The ownership of all county roads located within the boundaries of a newly incorporated city or town shall revert to the city or town and become streets as of the official date of incorporation. However, any special assessments attributable to these county roads shall continue to exist and be collected as if the incorporation had not occurred. Property within the newly incorporated city or town shall continue to be subject to any indebtedness attributable to these roads and any related property tax levies.

The territory included within the newly incorporated city or town shall be removed from the road district as of the official date of incorporation. The territory included within the newly incorporated city or town shall be removed from a fire protection district or districts or library district or districts in which it was located, as of the official date of incorporation, unless the fire protection district or districts have annexed the city or town during the interim period as provided in *RCW 52.04.160 through 52.04.200, or the library district or districts have annexed the city or town during the interim period as provided in **RCW 27.12.260 through 27.12.290.

[ 1986 c 234 s 17.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 52.04.160 has been decodified and RCW 52.04.170 through 52.04.200 have been recodified as RCW 52.04.061 through 52.04.101, pursuant to 1984 c 230 s 89.

**(2) The reference to "RCW 27.12.260 through 27.12.290" appears to be erroneous. RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.395 relates to annexation of a city or town by a library district.